en: Vinegars
bg: Оцет
ca: Vinagres
cs: Octy
da: Eddike
de: Essige, Essig
es: Vinagres
fi: etikat
fr: Vinaigres, vinaigre
he: חומץ
hr: Octe
hu: Ecetek, Ecet
it: Aceti
ja: 酢
nl: Azijnen
pl: Ocet
pt: Vinagres
ru: Уксусы
tr: Sirke
zh: 醋

en: Spanish vinegars
bg: Испански оцет
es: Vinagres españoles
fr: Vinaigres espagnols
hr: Španjolski ocat

en: Balsamic vinegars
bg: Балсамико
de: Aceto balsamico, Balsamessige, Balsamessig
es: Vinagres balsámicos
fi: balsamietikat
fr: Vinaigres balsamiques
he: חומץ בלסמי
hr: Balzamični ocat
hu: Balzsamecet
it: Aceto balsamico
ja: バルサミコ酢, バルサミコす
nl: Balsamicoazijnen
pl: Ocet balsamiczny
pt: Vinagres balsâmicos
ru: Бальзамический уксус

en: Balsamic vinegars of Modena
de: Balsamico-Essig aus Modena
es: Vinagres balsámicos de Módena
fi: Modenalaiset balsamietikat
fr: Vinaigres balsamiques de Modène, Vinaigre balsamique de Modène
hr: Balzamični ocat od modene
hu: Modena balzsamecetje
it: Aceto balsamico di Modena
nl: Balsamico azijnen uit Modena
pt: Vinagres balsâmicos de Modena

en: Traditional Balsamic Vinegars, Aceto balsamico tradizionale
de: Traditionelle Balsamicoessige
fi: perinteiset balsamietikat
fr: Vinaigres balsamiques traditionnels, Aceto balsamico tradizionale
hr: Tradicionalni balzamični ocat
hu: Hagyományos balzsamecet, Tradícionális balzsamecet
it: Aceto balsamico tradizionale
nl: Traditionele balsamico azijn

en: Traditional Balsamic Vinegar of Modena, Aceto Balsamico Tradizionale di Modena
de: Balsamessig aus Modena, Aceto Balsamico di Modena
fi: Perinteiset Modenalaiset balsamietikat
fr: Vinaigre balsamique traditionnel de Modène, Aceto Balsamico Tradizionale di Modena
hr: Tradicionalni balzamični ocat iz modene
it: Aceto Balsamico Tradizionale di Modena
nl: Traditionele balsamico azijn uit Modena

en: Traditional Balsamic Vinegar of Reggio Emilia, Aceto Balsamico Tradizionale di Reggio Emilia
fr: Vinaigre balsamique traditionnel de Reggio Emilia, Aceto Balsamico Tradizionale di Reggio Emilia
hr: Tradicionalni balzamični ocat iz reggio emilie
it: Aceto Balsamico Tradizionale di Reggio Emilia

en: Cider vinegars, apple cider vinegars, Apple cider vinegar
bg: Ябълков оцет
de: Apfelessige
es: Vinagres de manzana, Vinagres de sidra y manzana, Vinagres de sidra
fi: Siiderietikat, Omenasiiderietikat, Omenasiiderietikka
fr: Vinaigres de cidre, vinaigre de cidre, vinaigres de cidre de pomme, Vinaigre de cidre de pomme, Vinaigres de pomme, Vinaigre de pomme
hr: Ocat od jabukovače
hu: Almaecet
it: Aceto di mele, Aceto di sidro, Aceto di sidro di mele, Aceti di sidro, Aceti di sidro di mele
ja: リンゴ酢, りんご酢, アップルサイダービネガー
nl: Ciderazijnen, Appelazijnen
pl: Ocet jabłkowy

en: Honey vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de miel
hr: Octa od meda
hu: Méz ecetek
nl: Honingazijnen

en: Rice vinegars
bg: Оризов оцет
de: Reisessig, Reisessige
es: Vinagres de arroz
fi: riisietikat
fr: Vinaigres de riz
hr: Rižin ocat
hu: Rizsecet
it: Aceto di riso
ja: 米酢
nl: Rijstazijnen
pl: Ocet ryżowy
zh: 米醋

en: White rice vinegars
bg: Бял оризов оцет
de: Weiße Reisessige
fr: Vinaigres de riz blancs
hr: Bijeli rižin ocat
hu: Fehér rizsecet
nl: Witte rijstazijnen
pl: Ocet z białego ryżu

en: Japanese rice vinegars
de: Japanische Reisessige
fr: Vinaigres de riz japonais
hr: Japanski rižin ocat
hu: Japán rizsecet
nl: Japanse rijstazijnen
pl: Japoński ocet ryżowy

en: Black rice vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de riz noirs
hr: Crni rižin ocat
hu: Fekete rizsecet
nl: Zwarte rijstazijnen

en: Red rice vinegars
de: Rote Reisessige
es: Vinagres de arroz rojos
fr: Vinaigres de riz rouges
hr: Crveni rižin ocat
hu: Piros rizsecetek
it: Aceti di riso rossi
ja: 赤米酢
nl: Rode rijstazijnen
pl: Ocet z czerwonego ryżu
zh: 红米醋

en: Kokumotsu Su
fr: Kokumotsu Su

en: Sugarcane vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de canne, vinaigre de canne à sucre
hr: Ocat od šećerne trske
nl: Suikerrietazijnen

en: White vinegars
bg: Бял оцет
de: Weiße Essige
fr: Vinaigres blancs, vinaigre blanc
hr: Bijeli ocat
hu: Fehér ecet
ja: ホワイトビネガー
nl: Witte azijnen
pl: Ocet biały

en: Wine vinegars
bg: Винен оцет
de: Weinessige
es: Vinagres de vino
fi: viinietikat
fr: Vinaigres de vin, vinaigre de vin
hr: Vinske octe
hu: Borecetek
it: Aceti di vino, aceto di vino
ja: ワインビネガー
nl: Wijnazijnen
pl: Ocet winny, Octy winne
pt: Vinagres de vinho
ru: Винные уксусы

en: Red wine vinegars
bg: Червен винен оцет
de: Rotweinessige
es: Vinagres de vino rojo
fi: punaviinietikat
fr: Vinaigres de vins rouges
hr: Crni vinski ocat
hu: Vörös borecet
it: Aceti di vino rosso
nl: Rode wijnazijnen
pl: Ocet z czerwonego wina
pt: Vinagres de vinho tinto

en: White wine vinegars
bg: Бял винен оцет
de: Weißweinessige
es: Vinagres de vino blanco
fi: valkoviinietikat
fr: Vinaigres de vins blancs
hr: Bijeli vinski ocat
hu: Fehér borecet
it: Aceto di vino bianco
nl: Witte wijnazijnen
pl: Ocet z białego wina
pt: Vinagres de vinho branco